PILGRIMAGE TO BETHANY-Typical of the countless pilgrimages to theA"cradle of the Resto ration" is this group sponsored by the Brown T roil Preacher Training School of Fort Worth. This tour of historic sites in Tennessee, Kentucky, Ohio and West Virginia is to become on annual affair. This group poses in front of the Campbell study on the grounds of the family home just outside Bethany.
INSIDE THIS ISSUE Eclitoriol: Renewed Interest in Restoration -··-·····--·--·-·········---·---.......... 2
Roots of Restoration ........................... __ ............................. ----·--·-·- .. --- 3
The Restoration Principle .. .. __ .................................................................... 4
Purposes of Restoration .......... - .............................. - ....... _ ........ ----·-·-·-· 5
The Present Status of the Restoration Movement ......................... .......... 6
The Church in America at Our Bicentennial ................................................ 7
The Future of the Restoration Movement ............... - ........ _, ___ .. __ .. 8
Declaration and Address ............................................................................. - .... 9
GJiloriaf Renewed Interest in Restoration A few days ago we attended a seminar conducted by our ·brethren who do not use Sunday schools as teaching tools. Held in Mexia, Texas, and hosted by the McKinney Str~t church, the seminar produced some good thinking by brethren whose names seldom appear in the columns'of the Firm Foundation. We feel that what th¢y had ·to say is important, and ·have requested permiss1onto print excerpts here. Each lengthy paper has been. severely edited in the interest of brevity only.
A careful effort was made not to change in the least the content of the message. We believe all will profit from the points of view expressed.
In addition, we are carrying the gist of an article on the Restoration Principle which was delivered by Raymond Kelcy, Firm Foundation staff writer, on the 1962
A!CC Lectureship program. This· article, quoted extensively by G. B. Shelburne and edited out for sake of space, contains so many good statements, as Shel~bqrne pointed out, that we felt it should be included in this issue.
We have a strong interest in the Restoration plea.
We believe it is valid. In every century the words of Peter are relevant when he wrote: "If any man speak, let him speak as the oracles of God."
We believe there is occurring today a forgetting of the principle stated ·by Thomas Campbell who coined the phrase, "In essentials unity, in opinions Jiberty, in everything charity." A tendency to withdraw from all who do not agree with us has fractured the Restoration Movement and divided us into groups and sub-groups.
We believe that the idea of going back to the Scriptures for it all makes sense. It pains us to see any group of brethren take a position and demand that all others accept that position or be disfellowshipped.
These positions are not the yardstick for measuring brethren. The Scriptures are.
It is a noticeable fact that the further to the right factions are the more divided they are. Although many will have a fit if someone calis the church a denomination, it is an undeniable fact that all sects show denominational marks, and the church -itself will have a harder time after every division proving it is not one. If sects within a denomination plead for undenominational Christianity, who do they think will listen?
Unity and Restoration are inseparable. If New Testament Christianity is restored, unity wili be automatic.
They make a mistake who try to gloss over existing differences and presume that unity already exists and that all we need is for someone to recognize it.
Wherever there is apostasy there is disunity. Sooner 2 [498]
or later groups with different opinions must sit down together and discuss them-honestly and sincerelyuntil we can come to a consensus before there can be any real unity of the faith.
It is one thing to offer the blessings of Restoration to the denominational world, and quite another thing when we try to get our own people to seriously consider i·t. On a number of occasions we have helped to plan meetings with those to the right of us and those to the left of us.. We have done it in the sincere hope of learning more perfectly what the will of the Lord is.
If we ·have missed it anywhere we want ·to know it now.
The sooner the better. We have no "side" to uphold and no banner to wave. We have no desire to whip anyone into line. We are interested only in measuring things by the Scriptures. What the Scriptures have ·bound we must bind. Wherein the Scriptures grant freedom we are equally as bound to grant that freedom.
When we begin to bind where the Bible has not bound or to loose where the Scriptures have not loosed, we begin to creedalize and sectarianize.
By the grace of God we ·had a chance at Restoration a hundred and fifty years ago. If we muffed the opportunity it is our fault. If others have the same visions-and many have-they have as much right to it as anyone. If they are able to more perfectly restore New Testament Christianity than we have been able to do, more power to them. If we can learn anything from them, we ought to. And if we can contribute anything to their search we ought. None have a monopoly on Restoration.
In many religious orders, and even in secular circles, are heard the distinct rum·blings of a groundswell of back-to-the-Bible sentiment. Even politicians are using the Fourth of July to urge a nation back to the Bible.
Church-anity has been substituted for Christianity, and people have lost confidence in churches. They have not lost confidence in the Bible, nor in the Ohrist of the Bible. We must not lose sight of the fact that is is New Testament Christianity we are trying to restore.
Many of the heirs of the Restora-tion have settled for church-anity.
Wherever it comes from, we welcome the freshing breeze of change back toward the Bible. RJevived interest in Restoration-the restoration of Christianity as it existed in the first century-stirs our hopes that even yet it may succeed. 
I'JB.M FOlJNDATION Reuel Lemmons. Editor Published weekly except the last Tuesday in December by the Firm Foundation Publishing House, 3110 Guadalupe Street, Austin, Texas. Second Class Postage paid at Austl:;:;n•:........=.Te=x=as=·---JIAILING ADDRESS Post Oftlce Box 610. Austin. T~s IJ'STOIJ'
TERltfS OF SUBSCRIPTION Single subscription, $7 per year. Club rate, $6 per year In clubs of five or more. Congregational rate, $5 per family per :vear.
Foreign subscription, $7.50. The date on your address label shows the time to which your subscription Is paid.
BUNDLE RATES In bundles of ten or more copies sent. to one address: twelve cents per copy.
FIRM FOUNDATION-AUGUST 10, 1976
Roots of Restoration THOMAS LANGFORD Some Preliminary Considerations I hold the opinion that we ourselves would do better not to make so much distinction between restoration and reformation, and to regard our heritage from the Campbell-Stone era as a continuation of that millennium-and-a-half-long task of reform-
of sweeping away the centuries' accumulation of debris and speculation and recapturing as well as we can, by God's help, the New Testament ideals of Christianity.
It is true, there is restoration in reformation, just as there is reformation in restoration. But it seems to me that the process is essentially the same, by whatever name. My point is simply that we should not divorce ourselves from the great work of Wycliffe, Calvin, and Luther and identify solely with Campbell, Stone, and Scott. The latter built upon the work of the former and without the former the accomplishments of the Campbell era would have been much more difficult.
Consequently, I see the roots of the restoration movement reaching back through Luther's time, through the Hussites and W aldenses, through the earliest rebellions against Catholic hierarchy, into the time of the apostles themselves. Restoration is an eminently Biblical concept, arising out of a common hope of Israel.
John's message, then, was a message of restoration. He came to call men back to God, from whom they had drifted. And he heralded the Messiah who would truly restore men to God by his ministry of reconciliation.
That Messiah continually -p-reaehed a message of restoration, and, Pfter his death, continued his work through his apostles who were called "ambassadors"for Christ, reconciling men to God. Their message was "if any one is in Christ, he is a new creature; the old has passed away, behold, the new has come." All that was lost in the first Adam could now be restored in the second.
The nature of man in his fa1len state is such that he has continually drifted away from God and been in need of restoration.
This was certainly true in Old Testament times as well as New. Note several descriptions of this phenomenon (2 Chron. 33:10-17).
The bo'Jk of Daniel tells of the captivity of God's people and of the long sufferin$!.'
they endured because of their unfaithfulness.
But the book is also filled with hope Ps Daniel receives visions and prophecy of the restoration of Jerusalem {9:25) and its sanctuary {8:14). The almost continuous cry of Israel throughout the Old Testament is "Restoration!"
Thus the roots of the Restoration princiule penetrate deep into antiquity and the principle remains valid so long as God's kingdom is among imperfect men. I sometimes hear brethren today arguing against the principle, saying that the Res-
Brother Langford is Dean of the Gra<)uate School of Texas Tech, in Lubbock, Texas.
Address: 3703-48th St.
toration ideal is impractical and will never work. I suspect they are talking about something else besides restoration;
perhaps they are thinking of the sectarian and divisive movements which have plagued the church of Christ in the name of restoration. The principle of restoration itself is as valid as the Bible and must always be the course of all those who seek to establish the way of God again wherever the wisdom of man holds sway.
Shortly after the death of the apostles, other trends arose to carry the church away from her original simplicity and purity. The occasional voices which were raised against this drifting apostasy were not successful in preventing it. Power centers developed and from the simple congregational autonomy of the first century the church moved gradually into the superecclesiasticism of the Roman Catholic Church by the sixth century. From then to the twelfth century, there was little real cha1lenge to the strange conglomerate of paganism, oriental mysticism, and Christianity which was the Catholic Church in both of its major divisions. One can find fleeting references to individuals and groups throughout this period who protested and in some cases persisted for a time, but their influence was relatively insignificant in relation to the progress and power of the Roman church.
The Reformation In the 12th and 13th centuries the Albigenses (named after Albi, a city in southern France) and Waldenses {named after Peter Waldo, a wealthy merchant of Lyons, France) arose in protest against Romanism and its lack of simplicity and unworldliness. In the 14th and 15th centuries there arose Wycliffe in England and Huss in Bohemia. Wycliffe was an Oxford scholar who began the first systematic translation of the Bible into English, believing that the Bible was the highest source of truth and that it contained all that was necessary to man's salvation.
Huss translated Wycliffe's writings and circulated them throughout the Balkan countries. The martyrdom of these great reformers touched off a tide of sentiment against the Catholic church, which ushered in the Great Reformation under Luther and Calvin in the 16th century.
We could go into the many variations of the Reformation under Luther, Zwingli, Calvin, Knox, and others, but their emphases may be summed under a few cardinal doctrines:
1. The authority of scripture 2. The right of every Christian to study the scripture 3. Salvation by faith rather than by works 4. The priesthood of all believers Anabaptists are especially interesting to the student of the American Restoration.
It was the Anabaptists who carried the Reformation principles beyond mere reforms in Catholicism. The German historian Walter Koehler remarked that "the Anabaptists are the Bible Christians of Reformation history, distinguished f1·om the Reformers through the extension of the Biblical norm beyond the purely religious into economic and social life." They regarded themselves as voluntary associations of believers and believed in the mutual ministry of the saints. They insisted on immersion and opposed infant baptism with vigor. They emphasized the spiritual life, the regular observance of the Lord's Supper, and separation of church and state. They wished to be known simply as "Christians" or "Brethren," and pled for a return to the Christianity of the first century. They were severely prosecuted by other Protestant groups, ostensibly because of their opposition to infant baptism, but likely also because they represented such a threat to the Protestant clergy, which in spite of the doctrine of the universal priesthood of all believers, remained very much a dominant feature of most churches.
The Glasites By the middle of the eighteenth century we come to movements in Great Britain which are more clearly identified with Restoration. The purpose of these groups was to reproduce the church of apostolic times. John Glas withdrew from the Church of Scotland because of his objection to its alignment with the state and because he believed congregations ought to be independent and at liberty to follow their own understanding of scriptures. Glas and his followers rejected all human creeds and practiced regular observance of the Lord's Supper. Robert Sandeman, Glas's son-inlaw, was probably the most significant man in the movement. He was a scholar and his theological works were widely read. He stressed a reasonable approach to religion and played down emotion. Probably the most famous man who belonged to the Glasite churches was Michael Faraday, the scientist.
The Glasites were effusionists at first, but A1·chibald McLean and Robert Carmichael, Glasite ministers, began to immerse after the apostolic order and their churches came to be known as Scotch Baptists. These churches were the forerunners of the churches of Christ in Great Britain and remarkably similar to the first Restoration churches in America.
The Haldanes It is with the Haldane brothers of Scotland, however, that we came to direct connections with Alexander Campbell and influences that were carried to America.
The Haldanes were wealthy men who supported a variety of religious causes. Their churches were congregational and the result of conscious effort to restore the exact pattern of New Testament churches in work, worship, ordinances, and ministry.
They defended infant baptism at first, but eventually gave it up. They practiced weekly observances of the Lord's Supper.
Alexander Camubell came in contact with the Haldane church in 1809 during the year he spent in Glasgow University after being shipwrecked with his family on the way to America from Ireland. He was 21
at the time.
(Continued on page 10)
3 [4991
The Restoration Principle G. B. SHELBURNE When we look at the religious world of our day, we see a picture. of utter confusion.
Hundreds of walTlng sects and parties exist among those who p~ofess to be believers in Christ. These parties wear different names, maintain different organizations and subscribe to diverse creeds.
All of us must agree that there is a crying need for something to be done about this tragic situation. This is true, because it is the Lord's will that all of his followers be one. Christ prayed, "That they all may be one· as thou, Father, art in me, and I in thee: that they also may be one in us;
that the world may believe that thou hast sent me" (John 17:21). Further, it is true because of the confusion and unbelief that are caused by the divisions that exist among the professed followers of Christ. It is true also that something needs to be done about the state of Christendom because of waste and duplication of effort, and because the cause of Christ is weakened by internal division. Christ sai?;
"Every kingdom divided against itself lS brought to desolation; and every city or house divided against itself shall not stand" (Matt. 12:25).
The Restoration Principle More and more believers in Christ are coming to agree that the only remedy for the schism and confusion that exist in the reJigious world today is an- effort to restore New Testament Christianity in its original purity and simplicity. '!h~ idea ~s. not merelv to reform the ex1stmg rehg~ous orderw We must rather seek to go all t~e way back to the original ground of Chnstianity as pictured in the New Testament -beyond denominations and human creeds, beyond Rome, and back to primi~ive Christianity.
We must seek in our bme to reproduce the apostolic church in "its docw trines, its ordinances, and its fruits."
There is here the return to a norm, the divine standard of authority from which men have departed. The process involves going back to the Bible only as a guide.
Men can never come together on the creeds, the theories, and the doctrines of men. But they can come together on the Bible as the common authority for united faith and action.
The restoration principle is well stated by Thomas Campbell in the Declaration and Address, one of the early documents of the Rest"Tation Movement in his country.
Our desire, for ourselves and our hrethren would be, that, rejecting human opinions and the inventions of men as of any authority, or as having any place in the church of God, we might forever cease from further contentions about such things; returning to and holding fast to the original standard ; taking the Divine Word alone for our rule;
the Holy Spirit for our teacher and guide to lead us into all truth: and Christ alone as exhibited in the Word, for our salvation, that, by so doing we 4 [500]
may be at peace among ourselves, and follow peace with all men and holiness, without which no man shall see the Lord (quoted by Earl West in Abilene Christian College Bible Lectures, 1962, p. 14).
Is this Principle Valid?
There are those who question the validity of the restoration principle. Dr. Alfred T. DeGroot of the Brite College of the Bible at Texas Christian University, says in a recent book, The Restoration Principle, that there is no fixed pattern of the organization, work, and worship of the church revealed in the New Testament.
Dr. DeGroot goes on to stress the importance of keeping alive the faith of the founder of Christianity. He says that "a valid restorationism must take its rise and create its formal expressions in the realm of New Testament attitudes, ways of life, and spiritual convictions."
The writer of this paper and many other brethren do not agree with the viewpoint expressed by Dr. DeGroot. While it is true that the spirit of Christianity needs to be restored, we believe that there is more to restoration than this. The principle of a fixed revelation of God's will for his people in their work and worship--a revelation of what he wanted to continue in all essential details, is very clearly taught in both the Old Testament and the New Testament.
In the Old Testament we see this principle illustrated in the work of great restorationists whom God raised up, and in the writings of the prophets.
The restoration principle is as clearly taught in the New Testament as in the Old Testament, as seen by the following considerations: Christ has been given "all authority in heaven and in earth" (Matt. 28:18, ARV). He is the one through whom God speaks to us in the age (Heb. 1:1, 2).
Christ sent the Holy Spirit to guide the apostles fully in speaking and writing his will, and we have it in the New Testament (John 14:26, 16:13). The Holy Spirit taught them all things and brought to their remembrance all that Christ had said unto them. He guided them "into all truth." The divine revelation is complete and final. The Holy Scriptures completely furnish us unto all good works (2 Tim. 3:16, 17). The New Testament was completed by the end of the first century AD., the Old Testament having been completed by 400 BC.
"The faith"-the system of teaching given through Christ, has been delivered "once and for all" unto the saints (Jude 3, ARV). Thus we see that in the inspired Scriptures God has provided a fixed norm or standard of divine authority for all time.
Further, it is worthy of note that the Lord always begins things right, and he begins things the way he wants them to continue. When God finished the original creation of all things, he "saw everything that he had made, and behold, it was very good" (Gen. 1 :31). Had sin not entered to mar the picture, all would have continued to be good and very good. Just so, when the church, the new spiritual creation, came from the hand of God, it was set in order perfectly (or God gave a perfect pattern for it). It was begun through the instrumentality of the apostles, who were guided directly by the Spirit of God. The Lord began it perfectly and as he wanted it to continue. 'fhus we read that the early disciples "continued steadfastly in the apostles' doctrine" (Acts 2 :42), and the disciples were to be taught to observe all things that the Lord commanded ..... "always, even unto the end of the world"(Matt. 28 :19-20).
The New Testament Pieture of the Church The church is pictured in the New Testament as a divine organism, governed only by divine authority. It is divine, because Christ built it (Matt. 16:18). It is the spiritual body of Christ, of which he is the only head (Eph. 1:22, 23). It is governed only by the authority of Christ, since all things are done in his name, or by his authority (Col. 3:17). The members of the church, and the church as a whole, wear only the names given by divine authority, refusing all human titles. The form of local church government is congregational, with each local church functioning as an independent unit under the oversight of its elders or bishops. There is no central governing agency on earth. The simple acts of public worship (singing, prayer, teaching, the communion, and giving) are observed each first day of the week (Acts 20:7). The terms of entrance into the church (faith, repentance, confession, and baptism) are preached to inquiring sinners, and those who gladly receive the word are added by the Lord to the church (Acts 2 :36-47). A holy manner of living is followed by the members of the church in their new life in Christ (Rom. 6 :3-4; 2
Peter 3:10, 11). The church is pictured as undenominational, with all of its members joined together in one body (Eph. 4:4; Col. 1 :18).
The Restoration Movement At the close of the eighteenth century and the beginning of the nineteenth, there was widespread unrest in religious circles in many parts of Europe and America.
Outstanding leaders arose in various countries, who, weary of sectarian narrowness and confusion and of the traditions of men, sought a complete return to the New Testament order. They pled for the discarding of all human names, practices, and creeds and the accepting of the Bible only as authority in religion.
The churches of Christ are among the heirs of this "Restoration Movement." We must confess that our efforts to implement this plea have been far from perfect, but we believe that the effort to restore the primitive church as it is pictured in the New Testament is a noble ideal. Its validity is not disproved by the weaknesses of men.
What Should We Do Today?
We should accept the Bible only as authority, not only in theory but in actuality.
To this end, we should refuse all human names, organizations, practices, and creeds and should actually seek to follow the (Continued on page 5)
FIRM FOUNDATION-AUGUST 10, 1976
Purposes of Restoration JOH N WAD DEY Churches of Christ in America today are heirs of a distinct movement that sprang up on this cont inent at the turn of the nineteenth century. Noble men and women dedicated their lives to the goal of restoring the original Christianity of the f irst century in t heir day. They sensed the fu tility of attempting to r eform the existing denominations. They concluded that the only practical way to have pure Christianity was to bypass all the existing bodies and begin fr om "scratch" with the new Testament as their sole guide and blueprint.
Reasons a nd Motives No doubt each man who contributed to this movement had many reasons for his effor ts. It is also most likely that none of the leaders ever wr ote clown for posterity all of t heir motives.
Yet we can glean some a ll important goals that were shared by all t he great 1·estoration pioneer s. For the sake of our r eaders who do not yet share our f aith, we would hasten to add that t he Restoration movement of the nineteenth century was not an organized movement with a governing body over it. Not even a single individual can be looked upon as the leader or spokesman.
That very f irst generation sa·v a number of talented men in widely scattered parts of t he la nd, wit h distinctly different religious backerounds, launch their own attempt to recover pure Chridianity. This was done without an organized, coordinated effort. It is a fascinating study to trace the growth of t his r est01:
ation movement and to read of the struggles to arrive at that pure r eligion of the f irst century.
The restorers wanted to overcome the problem of religious division t hat plagued the believers in Christ. They felt unity could only be realized in Christ and upon the basis of His New Covenant. All sain ts should speak the same thing, and be of t he samemindandjudgment (1 Cor. 1:10).
They wanted to restor e t he original s implicity and purity of worship of the Lord's church. The centuries had produced numbers of additions and subtractions to the true worship of God outlined in the New Testament. The Lord's Supper needed to be restored to its proper place as the center of Lord's Day wor ship.
Every saint deserved the privilege to eat t he bread and drink the irui't of the vine upon the first day of the week (Acts 20 :17). The accumulation of such un scriptural items as incense, candles, holy water, images, crucifixes, and pr ayer beads needed to be swept away.
They sought to discover and proclaim again the gospel plan of salvation first spoken by the Lord and then his holy apostles (He!:>. 2:3), Knowing that sinners could not be saved by faith only (James 2 :24), or by works done in his own righteousness (Titus 3 :5); they sought and found that way revealed by Christ.
The New Testament posited salvation upon faith in Christ, repentance of sin, confession of faith, and immersion in water (Mark 16:16; Rom. 10:9, 10; Acts 2 :38).
They desired to restore the local congregation of Christians to its rightful place. Each community of·saints should be selfgoverning under Christ and his inspired word. Christ knew nothing of popes or patria r chs dominating his people. Elders, not preachers, were to rule the congregation (Acts 20 :17, 28-
31). Associations, conventions, synods, confer ences, and councils to govern the churches wer e a ll the creations of man and needed to be elimi nated.
They longed to exalt the Bible to its proper place as the final a nd complete authority in Chris tianity. They had seen the damage clone by the creeds of the churches. They rejected the traditions of men (l\llatt. 15 :6-9). Their plea was "back to the Bible." It was "to the law and to the testimony" for them ( Isa. 8 :20). They wanted to find and abide in the doctrine of Christ (2 John 9).
They yearned to rid the world of sectarian names in r eligion and to r estore the name of Christ to its honored place. They were not ashamed to be merely "Christians" (1 Peter 4 :16).
Since the church was Christ's by right of purchase, why not call it "t he chur ch of Christ" even as did Paul? (Rom. 16 :16). Of course t hey objected not to any other Biblical name for saints or congregations.
They felt an obligation to 1·id Christia nity of a ll those con·uptions and errors that had crept in over the centuries, whether in faith or in practice, whether large or small. They were convinced that this could only be accomplished by a r ejection of all the denominations of men and a complete return to t he divine blueprint layed out in God's word (2 Tim. 1:13; Heb. 8 ;5b) ..
That first generation of men succeeded adn11rably 111 theH'
efforts. Across the land a mighty wave of God-fearing people joined hands in the effort. We would not be so bold as to cla~m that we have perfectly r eproduced the total program of Chnst today. But I hasten to affirm that those of your neighbors known as t he churches of Chri st are diligently striving after that goal.
Every saint in every generation must in his own life dedicate himself to that noble effort-ie., to be nothing more or less t han the kind of Christ ian as were Peter, J ames and John, Paul, and a myriad of others we read of in the New Testament. Will you not join with us in this honorable pursuit?
THE RES'fORATION PRINOIPLE (Continued from page 4)
also among those on the inside. Here are some things that must be done.
some doctrinal posit ion which we have long espoused. We must sanctify in our hearts Christ as Lord and let him and his will r eign supremely in all of our r elationships and in all areas of our lives. The question should not be what we want, but, r ather, "Lord, what wilt thm~ have me to do?" If we find that we have been wrong and t hat we have occupied a position that is out of harmony with the will of Christ, our loyalty to him should lead us to abandon that position.
Bible only as our guide in spiritual matters.
We should ma ke every effort to reproduce the apostolic church in our t ime.
This can be accomplished by for saking all of the sects that men have founded a nd by following the New Testament pattern for the church.
We should make a conscious and purposeful effort to realize the unity for which Christ prayed. There must be an understanding and acceptance of the New Testament concept of undenominational Christianity, that "there in one body ...
one Lord, one faith, one baptism" (Eph. 4:4, 6). Men must be led to come to Christ in simple faith and submission to his will and to become Christians and Christim1s only, j oined together in one body in Christ.
The plea for unity must be pursued not only with those outside of the church, but 1. In our eagerness to bring about unity, Jet us never forget that the only unity that is worthwhlle or that can please God is unity based on God's wo1·d. Christ prayed not only for his immediate disciples, but "for them also which shall believe on me tlwough their wo1·d, that they all may be one." Peter said, "If any man speak, let him speak as t he oracles of God" (1 Peter 4 :11). The early leaders in the Restoration Movement said, "Where the Bible speaks, we speak; where the Bible is silent, we are silent." Any sor t of unity gained by compromising principles of divine truth, or simply through an amalgamation of sects, would not please God and would be u·ntrue to our historic plea. 2. Secondly, in any sear ch for unity our first allegiance must be loyalty to Ch1-ist, r ather than to men, to party, or merely to 3. In the third place, I suggest that there must be a 1·ealistic app?·octch to our problems if we are ever to make much real progress toward t he working unity that God wills and that we desire. While I gladly recognize that all in every pl~ce who have truly obeyed the gospel of Chnst and have been added by the Lord to his church are my brethren in this general sense, this r ecognition does not within it-
( Continued on page 11)
5 [5011
The Present Status of the Restoration Movement J. W. LEACH In 1811 a group of New England Christians led by Abner Jones and Elias Smith, a group of Virginia Christians led by James O'Kelly, and a group of Kentucky Christians led by Barton W. Stone merged their respective works. A dozen years later these disciples joined forces with the Alexander Campbell following.
When Campbell and the other three groups merged, a segment of the congregations did not follow. This resulted in the Christian Denomination, later to merge with the Congregational Church (1931)
and with the Evangelical and Reformed Church (1957) to form today's United Church of Christ. The 6,635 churches claim 1,895,016 members. This body is very ecumenical, but has little interest in the restoration principle.
The remainder of the restoration movement has given us a heritage, not of "ecumenicity,"
but of division. One can easily count at least a dozen fragments. Ironically, the closer these fragments hold to the restoration principle, the more they are divided.
This fragmentation did not begin until after the Civil War. The last quarter of the nineteenth century saw trouble leering ominously over these churches as they debated about cooperation among the ~"'nrches and thP use ,.~ instn,'me..,tal music in worship. By the 1906 census, the trouble had resulted in the listing of two separate bodies of disciples-the Christian Churches with instrumental music and missionary societies and the non-instrumental churches of Christ.
The Christian churches took the North, the urban society. and the more educated of the membership. They denominated themselves Christian Churches, Disciples, and Churches of Christ.
Hi~her criticism and a renudiation of the doctrine of plenary verbal insniration came with the higher education. The natural outcome of this was the rejection of the Bible as a pattern or blueprint authority and, ultimately. the abandonment of the restoration nlea. Since the Bible was the evolution of human endeavor. there was no authoritative pattern t,., restore.
In 1968 these took denominational structure and became one of the largest six churches in the United States with 4.609
churches and a membership of 1,356,914.
Like the United Church of Christ. the Disciples of Christ are more concerned with the ecumenical movement and union than with the restoration of anv doctrine.
The independent Christian Churches did not go along with the Disciples' restructuring nor with the rejection of the restoration principle. There are 5.479 churches with approximately 1,036.460 members who call themselves either Christian Churches or churches of Christ. These hold fast to restorationism but are not persuaded that the Bible's pattern demands a capella music.
Meanwhile, in the non-instrumental segment of. the Campbell-Stone heritage, debates and divisions continued even after 6 [502]
separation over the music question. The questions are many: Does the appeal to restoration of the Bible's blueprine allow Sunday schools, or not? Does it require one cup, or is the cup the content rather than the container? Is the New Testament pattern one of mutual edification, or can a. minister serve under the local congregational elders? Can churches cooperate in works, or must each church send directly to the helped activity?
Churches of Christ claim about 2 million members which are scattered over the United States with greatest strength in Tennessee and Texas. But these Christians are deplorably fragmented. Even where there ·is no open division, one can see definite conservative/liberal parties.
Our own non-Sunday school segment came about following debates in the noninstrumental wing during the first quarter of the 20th century. About 25,000 members in 500 churches plead for work without Sunday schools. The ratio between the Sunday school and Non-Sunday school is about 99 to 1!
Criticisms of the Modern Restoration Movement Three major criticisms are leveled at today's restorationists:
Division: The first challenge to the vali~ity of the restoration plea is pragmatic.
It has not produced the unity which it has historically stood for. Instead of bringing about unity, it is so fragmented that its unity plea is ludicrous. This raises serious questions: If we cannot unite ourselves, how can we expect others to unite with us?
Denomi1Uttionalism: While members of the restoration movement have criticized denominations and have asked that we unite in non-denominational Christianity, our non-denominational status has become suspect. Consider this definition of a denQ~ination: "1. Act of denominating, or naming. 2. A name, designation, or title;
esp., a general name; a category. 3. A class, or society of individuals called by the same name; a sect. The working definition used among us is similar: A denomination is a sect, naming itself and separated from others by adherence to a peculiar creed.
Practically, either definition includes the restoration movement today.
Solutions, Good and Bad The deplorable state of the restoration movement has either evolved an accepted status quo or has caused some Christian thinkers to propose alternatives.
Isolationism: The present evolved state is isolationism. We see ourselves as the remnant of God's true people in society, and thus we have withdrawn from all the practitioners of error. Like a psychological group, the church consists of people, dependent on each other, who maintain a common set of beliefs, values, and norms to regulate conduct. We isolate ourselves to protect menibers of this group from outside influences and conflicting opinions which might threaten group solidarity.
Strict censorship controls the input into the group as ·further protection of group identity. Relentless expounding of the faith and/ or suppression of dissent follows when the group's common ideology is threatened.
Menninger, following Professor Janis, gives eight symptoms of "group-think:"
1. Illusion of invulnerability. 2. Participants in group-think ignore warnings and construct rationalizations to discount the warnings. 3. Unquestioning belief in the inherent morality (rightness) of ingroup actions. 4. Stereotyped views of enemy group leaders. 5. Pressure on individuals who doubt the group's shared illusions, or who question the validity of the arguments. 6. Unanimity is idolized. 7. Tendency to split into subgroups and sub-sub-groups. 8. Limitation of discussion to only a few alternative courses of action.
Look at any segment of the churches of Christ and you see "group-think"!
Further, isolationism destroys needed communication and handicaps the sharing of our message with others. Meaningful and Christian dialogue is necessary both among the restoration groups and with the denominations, if we ever hope to make our unique plea known. We cannot do this in isolationism.
A New Hermeneutic: Others have met the crisis within the restoration movement by suggesting a revised hermeneutic principle.
A few have reexamined the restoration plea. called it a failure, and rejected it as based on an invalid hermeneutic. To ·reexamine the nlea is good. We must never become afraid to F~ubmit our doctrines to reexamination. If they cannot stand serutiny, they are suspect from the beginning.
However. the insniration and authority of the Bible is at stake he-re. The call for the rest')r~tion of the Biblic~l standard stands ~nd falls with the doctrine of an i'lQTlirerl Rible.
Rut believers in Biblical insniration ::~nd nattern n>Rtoration still face the questio'l of how t"hP. Bible communicates its authoritative bluenrint. HistoricallY. the restoration movement's hermeneutic sees the blueprint established by direct commands, approved examples, and necessg-
ry inference.
Recently, Bob Burg-ess wrestled with re~
toration hermeneutics and concluded that the eternal nattern was only commands directly related to the cross. All other commal'lds are cnstom and subject to change.
The view of Bur~ess is suspect, however.
As a nrincinle illustration of commands not related to the cross and. therefore. not mtttern but custom. he cited the cf'lmmand f:ll let women keep silence in the churches.
Rut to read this nrohibition in context is to see a command with much more force th::~n mere custom. Since BurJress's thesis fails at a point of particular illustration, it mt1st he re:iected.
But what about the tradition of command, approved example, and necessary (Continued on page 12)
FIRM FOUNDATION--AUGUST 10, 1976
The Church in America at Our Bicentennial RUBEL SHELLY A great deal of attention is being focused on the history of our nation in her bicentennial year. There have been TV specials, books, magazine articles, re-creations of significant historical events, etc.
There have also been tons of junk manufactured and dumped onto the market in an effort to "cash in" on the patriotic fever of this very special year.
All the positive and noble parts of this historical celebration are commendable, and the Christian need not feel embarrassed about his love for his country. There seems to be a tide of anti-patriotism abroad in the country among many who have been soured by the Watergate scandal, revelations of misconduct in Congress, and similar shameful episodes. But the Christian, whether he lives in the United States or in Red China, is to respect and submit to civil authorities.
Historical Markings The beginning of the church of Christ goes back 1746 years before the founding of the United States of America and is independent of any racial consideration, geographical boundary, or particular form of government.
Salvation and its a~companying entrance into the kingdom of God are universally available to all through the gospel.
The church has never become extinct since its establishment on the day of Pentecost, AD. 30. Apostasy has overshadowed the church, and false leaders of men have persecuted the church. The main focus of secular history has not followed the church. But Jesus gave his word that the "gates of hades" would not prevail against his church.
In the British Isles of the seventeenth century, a number of independe.. n t movements sprang up with a desire to go back to the Bible and be the simple church of Christ. John Glas left the Church of Scotland in 1728 because he believed the church should· be under Scripture rather than the state; Robert Sand em an ( Glas' son-inlaw)
carried on the movement and stressed the ideal of restoring the church as it was in New Testament days. Robert and James Haldane left the Church of Scotland in 1799 and argued for congregational independence and weekly observance of the Lord's Supper. While spending a year at the University of Glasgow, Alexander Campbell came under the strong influence of a Haldemanian named Grevilie Ewing and was attracted to the notion of restoration.
Such movements as the ones just named -as well as others similar to them-felt that the Protestant Reformation had crystallized around certain sectarian views and that a new effort needed to be made to go all the way back to the New Testament order of things.
It was in the intellectural soil of the new world that these ideas were to have their fuliest expression and greatest fruition.
In the early years of this country, only about one-tenth of the population held membership in any particular denomination-
although personal religious beliefs were more widely held than this figure would · imply. Deism and skepticism had good footholds on the continent. Religious division had contributed greatly to the decline of interest in "organized religion."
Yet, the absence of a state-sponsored religion and the liberty of men to express their religious beliefs were important factors which created a climate favorable to the notion of restoration.
The period right around the Revolutionary War was one of decline for religious activity in general, for everything was focused on the war for independence from England. But around 1800 the Second Great Awakening began, with its most notable success in Kentucky, Tennessee ~eorgia, and the states immediately ad:
Jacent. This was the period of revivalism and camp meetings in America.
Into this confused but fertile situation came such figures as James O'Kelly (Virginia), Barton W. Stone (Kentucky) and Thomas and Alexander Campbell (Pennsylvania-
Virginia). The Restoration Movement in America had begun. There was no thought of establishing another denomination, only of going back to the pattern for the church as revealed in the New Testament.
The leaders of the young United States were not trying to create "justice"and "freedom"; they were trying rather to create an environment where these ideals could be put into common practice.
Similarly the leaders of the Restoration Movement were not trying to create "truth" or "the church"; they were trying to focus the attention of men on the Scripture and bring them to a common belief and practice of its contents.
By the time of the Civil War, there were perhaps a quarter of a million Christians in America; by 1900, over a million were attempting to take the word of God as their sole authority in religion. They insisted on having a "Thus saith the Lord" for the tenets of their religion.
Some Tragic Failures Several figures who rose to prominence in the Restoration Movement evidently never understood or appreciated the plea for Scripture as the sole authority in religion. Thus was introduced the missionary society. Then there was a widespread acceptance of instrumental music. And finally the bold liberalism of the late nineteenth century infiltrated the church and manifested itself in countless ways.
The census of 1906 listed "Churches of Christ" and "Disciples of Christ" separately.
About 250,000 were said to be identified with the former and approximately a million with the latter.
In the 1950's, a split occurred on the sinful the actions of congregations who worked cooperatively in evangelistic or benevolent programs.
From the mid-60's to the present, a new wave of liberalism (in the form of Neo-
Orthodox Theology) has struck. Many ~f these people were less honest than their ·predecessors into apostasy in the Disciples group; they did not dissociate themselves from faithful brethren but bored from within to tear down and destroy. At about the same time, strong Pentecostal inroads were made at a few places. Pentecostalism now appears rather confined and is not so serious a threat; liberalism continues to work in many influential places; and narrow dogmatism seems to be able to manipulate the fear of both Pentecostalism and liberalism to its own unlovely ends.
The Glorification of God Through these turbulent years, God has had a faithful people who have held tenaciously to the word of God and served him with zeal. In spite of the setbacks encountered, the church has grown to a membership of two and a half million; the Disciples of Christ have just over half as large a membership. Churches with evangelistic fervor have reached out both here and abroad to spread the saving gospel with love. Service to the poor and help for the weary are given to the glory of God.
This is not to say that there is room for self-satisfaction and ease. While it is true that we have grown by the grace and strength of our Lord, the world has grown faster! We are not even keeping up on a percentage basis with the population growth of the world with conversions to Christ!
Our opportunities as we enter the third hundred years of this nation's existence have never been greater.
We need local churches to exercise initiative and vision. The cutting edge of the work of God among men is not accomplished at colleges or lectureships but in local churches. Such bodies must be built up and made strong through the word of God (cf. Eph. 4:14-16).
Evangelism must be the work of these strong local churches. It is still the will of the Lord that "every creature" of "all the world" should hear the good news of salvation (Mark 16:15).
And we must be alert to the needs of those around us. We must be a more compassionate people and "work that which is good toward all men" (Gal. 6:10). Whether the need is for food or help with a personal or family crisis, we must act through love to meet the need.
Conclusion The third century of this country's history should witness the greatest expansion of the work of God among men around the world that has been seen since the first century.
Our only limitation is our faithfulness.
We must teach sound doctrine, for God will not be with us if we leave the authority of the word (2 John 9-11). We must live pure lives, for the world will not be attracted to the Savior by people who are compromised by faithless lives ( cf. James 1 : 27b). we must give our very all to the Lord in his zealous service {Rom. 12:11).
The challenge is here and it is real. May we resolve to be strong in commitment that we might glorify our God through greater service. 7 [503]
The Future of the Restoration Movement ELMORE JOHNSON The story of the Restoration Movement in America that began about 1800 is one of the most thrilling stories of American history. Having its beginning with different men in different parts of the United States, these movements were united into one body which "within the space of fifty years become the largest and most influential brotherhood of Christian believers indigenous to American soil." The men who brought forth this movement seemed to be men of vision. They invisioned a purified New Testament church. Their slogans were similar.
Janes O'Kelly, a North Carolina Methodist preacher, along with several disciples, came to accept as their basis belief the Lordship of Christ as the only head of the church, the name Christian to the exclusion of all others, and the Bible as their only creed or rule of faith and practice.
Barton W. Stone, along with those associated with him, came to believe that they should preach the simple gospel with;out the traditions of men. They said, "Take the Bible only." But it was left for the Campbells to set the slogan of the movement when they advocated, "We speak where the Bible speaks, and are silent where the Bible is silent." They called upon men to use Bible terms when speaking of Bible things.
While these men envisioned a purified New Testament church, little did they realize that this movement would fall into trouble and be the beginning of three religious groups that would have very little fellowship with one another, and with different ideas concerning restoration. These three groups are: the Disciples of Christ, the Independent Christian Churches, and the churches of Christ.
The "Principle" Upheld First, there is very little concern for the future of the Restoration Movement, but there is a deep concern for the future of the church of our Lord. While. very little interest is shown in the history of the movement, our concern for the future of the church expresses belief in the Restoration Principle. As one brother wrote, I believe that the truth as was preached in the first century is being preached today. I also believe th~t when it is received and obeyed it produces Christians .... I do not hold to the idea that new truth will be revealed, nor methods found that will change the need for preaching the Gospel as the New Testament sets it forth.
Another brother put it this way, ... if you mean spiritual restoration then we must return to the Bible and begi~ there, rather than many years later. I feel that there is also a strong movement in this direction and I pray that this will be the course which we follow. Surely we need to get back to the Bible as the standard and follow it carefully if we would please God and restore New Testament Christianity.
In fact there is a feeling that the ex-
8 [504]
pression "Restoration Movement" has outgrown its usefulness. One said, "I think. .. the name is dead •. . Our religious neighbors do not get lathered up to help when we speak of "Restoring the church."
Another said, I am quite convinced that "restoration" says very little to this generation although it was very significant when Thomas Campbell wrote the Declaration and Address. I think we must plea for "renewal through recovery of the apostolic proclamation, purpose and power."
This makes sense when I converse with conventions of the clergy drawn from the so-called evangelical sector.
One thing seems to stand out. All brethren believe that the "word of God is the seed of the kingdom" and if this word is sown in the hearts of men and women it will produce what it did in the first century.
Opti·mistic Attitudes There is an optimistic attitude on the part of my brethren for the church of our Lord. Brethren are more willing to support preachers of the gospel. Preachers are willing to train themselves for preaching the gospel and willing to devote their lives to preaching. The brethren with whom we are associated have a mind to work and are striving to work together in a spirit of peace and cooperation. The spirit of Christ is being cultivated and this will contribute to the growth of God's kingdom.
There are supporting reasons for the optimism. Various religious movements in the last few years have helped call men back to the Bible. Such movements as the "Jesus movement" and the "charismatic movement" created a climate for nondenominational religion by de-emphasizing the highly structured denominations. They also brought men's thoughts back to a Bible-centered religion and autonomous congregations. The ecumenical movement has created a climate for unity. Besides these, movements within the Restoration Movement itself are good signs. There is a strong movement away from exclusivism and legalism. And family emphasis has de-emphasized Sunday Schools and has led us to the point that we have the structure to meet the present-day situation. While one writer pointed out that none of these things are totally right within themselves, nor are they goals to be singled out, yet taken as a whole they show a wholesome trend. The climate is good, and the future is bright.
At the beginning of the twentieth century to have found a preacher among us with a college education would have been the exception rather than the rule. The average preacher of that day knew little about Karl Barth and Emil Brunner or the new dialectical theology. They really had no concern for them and their ideas.
Thev did. however. know their Bibles. ThPy really had no concern for them and their ideas. They did, however, know their Bibles.
They had a deep belief in the inspired word and believed strongly in the idea of speaking where the Bible speaks and remaining silent where it was silent. As one writer stated, "They entered the twentieth century largely Southern, largely rural, and on the wrong side of the tracks."
But conditions have changed. We have sent our boys and girls to college and they returned home reading not only Karl Barth and Emil Brunner but a whole host of new liberal writers who have spread their poisonous ideas through the printed page.
It is nothing unusual to bear some preacher quote men of the day in his sermons as if these men were sources of authority. I believe we can meet the challenge of an educated society and not be swept away with th~ tide of modernism. It may require moving back on the other side of the track and following the advice of Barton W.
Stone when he and other advocated "that the people henceforth take the Bible as the only sure guide to heaven; and as many as are offended with other books, which stand in competition with it, may cast them into the fire if they choose; for it is better to enter into life having one book, than having many to be cast into hell." If this is what it takes may God hasten the day!
The women's liberation movement in America and other countries will cause brethren to restudy the question concerning the role of women in the church.
Already there 2re signs that some may advocate a woman's ministry. The instructions given by Paul to the church at Corinth and to Ephesus through Timothy have become matters that were cultural and had nothing to do with a binding rule upon women in other societies and times, we are being told. In times past we have battled among ourselves concerning woman's place in the church as we have considered the "Sunday School question."
This new movement may bring· about a union of old foes as the battle for a women's ministry descends upon the church.
The "charismatic movement" may be a question that we will have to face more than we are today. While some see this movement as an indication of a better climate for restoration principles, others see it as a departure from the revealed truth. One brother wrote, That the indwelling Spirit dwells in the Christian in varying intensities and gives a relationship which transcends the printed page ... is not only out of harmony with God's Word, but is a very dangerous view. The idea that the Holy Spirit directs us through inner-consciences'
leadings and communications separate and apart from the Word is deterimental, not only to the Restoration Movement, but to the church set forth in the New Testament.
And we might add that this view is out of harmony with the plea made by those of the Restoration Movement as they urged men to a "return to the Bible."
Probably one of the biggest problems that will face the church of tomorrow will be those that deal with morals. What does the Bible teach about abortion? What does the Bible say about "mercy killing"? And while you are thinking over these, how do (Continued on page 14)
FIRM FOUNDATION-AUGUST 10, 1976
(Following are the thirteen propositions of Thomas Campbell's "Declaration and Address," published September 7, 1809).
Let none imagine that the subjoined propositions are at all intended as an overture toward a new creed or standard for the Church, or as in any wise designed to be made a term of communion; nothing can be farther from our intention. They are merely designed for opening up the way, that we may come fairly and firmly to original ground upon clear and certain promises, and take up things just as the apostles left them; that thus disentangled from the accruing embarrassments of intervening ages, we may stand with evidence upon the same ground on which the Church stood at the beginning. Having said so much to solicit attention and prevent mistake, we submit as foJlows:
Prop. 1. That the ·Church of Christ upon C8"'th js ef!s~ntially, int~ntion~Jly, and constitutionally one; consisting of all those in every place that profess their faith in Christ and obedience to him in all things according- b the Scrintures. and that manifest the same by their tempers and conduct and of none else; as none else can be trul; and properly called Christians. 2. That although the Church of Christ upon earth must necessarily exist in particular and distinct societies, locally separate one from another, yet there ought to be no schisms, no uncharitable divisions among them. They ought to receive each other as Christ Jesus hath also received them, to the glory of God. And for this purpose they ought all to walk by the same rule, to mind and speak the same thing;
and to be perfectly joined together in the same mind, and in the same judgment. 3. That in order to this, nothing ought to be inculcated upon Christians as articles of faith; nor required of them as terms of communion, but what is expressly taught and enjoined upon them in the word of God. Nor ought anything to be admitted, as of Divine obligation, in their Church constitution and managements, but what is expressly enjoined by the authority of our Lord Jesus Christ and his apostles upon the New Testament Church; either in express terms or by approved precedent. 4. That although the Scriptures of the Old and New Testaments are inseparably connected, making together but one perfect and entire revelation of the Divine will, for the edification and salvation of the Church, and therefore in that respect can not be separated; yet as to what directly and properly belongs to their immediate object, the New Testament is as perfect a constitution for the worship, discipline, and government of the New Testament Church. and as nerfect a rule for the particular duties of its members, as the Old Testament was for the worship, discipline, and government of the Old Testament Church, and the particular duties of its members. 5. That with respect to the commands and ordinances of our Lord Jesus Christ, where the Scriptures are silent as to the express time or manner of performance, if any such there be, no human authority has power to interfere, in order to supply Declaration and Address the supposed deficiency by making laws for the Church; nor can anything more be required of Christians in such cases, but only that they so observe these commands and ordinances as will evidently answer the declared and obvious end of their institution. Much less has any human authority power to impose new commands or ordinances upon the Church, which our Lord Jesus Christ has not enjoined. N othing ought to be received into the faith or worship of the Church, or be made a term of communion among Christians, that is not as old as the New Testament, 6. That although inferences and deductions from Scripture premises, when fairly inferred, may be truly called the doctrine of God's holy word, yet are they not formally binding upon the consciences of Christians farther than they perceive the connection, and evidently see that they are so; for their faith must not stand in the wisdom of men, but in the power and veracity of God. Therefore, no such deductions can be made terms of communion, but do properly belong to the after and progressive edification of the Church.
Hence, it is evident that no such deductions or inferential truths ought to have any place in the Church's confession. 7. That although doctrinal exhibitions of the great system of Divine truths, and defensive testimonies in opposition to prevailing errors, be highly expedient, and the more fu11 and explicit they be for those purposes, the better; yet, as these must be in a great measure the effect of hum~n reasoning, and of course must contam many inferential truths, they ought not to be made terms of Christian communion;
unless we suppose, what is contrary to fact, that none have a right to the communion of the Church, but such as possess a very clear and decisive judgment, or are come to a very high degree of doctrinal information; whereas the Church from the beginning did, and ever wiii, consist of little children and young men, as well as fathers. 8. That as it is not necessary that persons should have a particular knowledge or distinct apprenhension of all Divinelyrevealed truths in order to entitle them to a place in the Church; neither should they, for this purpose, be required to make a profession more extensive than their knowledge; but that,· on the contrary, their having a due measure of Scriptural selfknowledge respecting their lost and perishing condition by nature and practice, and of the way of salvation through Jesus Christ, accompanied with a profession of their faith in and obedience to him, in all things, according to his word, is all that is absolutely necessary to qualify them for admission into his Church. 9. That all that are enabled through grace to make such a profession, and to manifest the reality of it in their tempers and conduct, should consider each other as the precious saints of God, should love each other as brethren, children of the same family and Father, temples of the same Spirit, members of the same body, subjects of the same grace, objects of the same Divine love, bought with the same price, and joint-heirs of the same inheritance.
Whom God hath thus joined together no man should dare to put asunder. 10. That division among the Christians is a horrid evil, fraught with many evils.
It is antichristian, as it destroys the visible unity of the body of Christ; as if he were divided against himself, excluding and excommunicating a part of himself. It is antiscriptural, as being strictly prohibited by his sovereign authority; a direct violation of his express command. It is antinatural, as it excites Christians to contemn, to hate, and oppose one another, who are bound by the highest and most endearing obligations to love each other as brethren, even as Christ has loved them. In a word, it is productive of confusion and of every evil work. 11. That (in some instances) a partial neglect of the expressly revealed will of God, and (in others) an assumed authority for making the approbation of human opinions and human inventions a term of communion, by introducing them into the constitution, faith, or worship of the Church, are, and have been, the immediate, obvious, and univ~rsa1Iy-ackno~I~~ged causes, of all the corruptions and diVISions that ever have taken place in the Church of God. 12. That all that is necessary to the highest state of perfection and purity of the Church upon earth is, first, that none be received as members but such as having that due measure of Scriptural self-knowledge described above, do profess their faith in Christ and obedience to him in all things according to the Scriptures; nor, secondly, that any be retained in her communion longer than they continue to manifest the reality of their profession by their temper and conduct. Thirdly, that her ministers, duly and Scripturally qualified, inculcate none other things than those very articles of faith and holiness expressly revealed and enjoined in the word of God.
Lastly, that in all their administrations they keep close by the observance of all Divine ordinances, after the example of the primitive Church, exhibited in the New Testament; without any additions whatsoever of human opinions or inventions of men. 13. Lastly. That if any circumstantials indispensably necessary to the observance of Divine ordinances be not found upon the page of express revelation, such, and such only, as are absolutely ne(!essary for this purpose should be adopted under the title of human expedients, without any pretense to a more sacred origin, so that any subsequent alteration or difference in the observance of these things might produce no contention nor division in the Church. 9 [505]
ROOTS OF RESTORATION (Continued from page 3)
Beginnings In America But now I want to return to the beginnings of the movement in Amei:_ica. As you are doubtless aware, Alexander sailed to America in 1809 to meet his father who had arrived the year before. Both Thomas and Alexander were confessing Presbyterians at this time, though Thomas had had sufficient difficulty with sectarian attitudes to do some serious thinking about denominationalism in general. He had just written the "Declaration and Address" when Alexander arrived, setting forth his own understanding of scriptural ideals relating to salvation and fellowship. He was unaware of the changes in his son's thinking and was prepared for opposition.
Happily, the document set forth ideals to which both men were by now committed;
it has become the great Magna Charta of the movement, setting forth as it does so well a declaration of freedom in Christ and loyalty to the word of God without interpretation of creeds and church councils.
We must remember that at the time of the writing of this document, both Thomas Campbell and his son were still Presbyterians.
Neither had ever experienced immersion into Christ. That the principles were more far reaching than either ever realized at the time is a fact now recognized by all. Alexander soon told his father that, while he accepted the Declaration as fully expressive of his own views of the proper aims of reformation, it would require that they surrender the practice of infant baptism. The father did not at first think that such an extreme conclusion was necessarily required. Upon further study, however, Thomas was among the members of his family when Matthias Luce, the Baptist evangelist, buried them one by one in the waters of little Buffalo Creek, not far from Bethany, West Virginia, almost three years after the Declaration was penned.
The Baptist Connection As the Campbells and their congregation became immersionists, it soon seemed appropriate to associate themselves with other immersionists in the Redstone Baptist Association. The Brush Run church was Baptist in practice but not in the denominational sense, and their association did not long prove comfortable to them or the other members of the Association.
Alexander's classic "Sermon on the Law,"
delivered before the Association's meeting in Cross Creek, Virginia, in August, 1816, so stirred the opposition of his Baptist brethren that by 1823 the Brush Run church withdrew from the Association, to join briefly with the Mahoning Association of Ohio, before concluding finally that the unity of the church could not be achieved within the framework of such associations.
The Primary Purpose of Early Restorers It should be pointed out that the aim of the early restorers was not to establish the church of Christ, but to give visibility to the church by playing down denominationalism.
They did not consider themselves the only Christians but wanted to be Christians only. They recognized as Christians all those who had believed in Jesus and 10 [506]
been immersed upon the basis of that belief.
They wished to call such Christians out of creedalism, out of denominationalism, into loyalty to Christ alone.
Although quite obviously the Christian system consisted of much more than faith and baptism, these elements were seen as prerequisite to discipleship status. All else belonged to what was called by Thomas Campbell "the after and progressive edification of the saints." This scriptural distinction between the message which attracts men into Christ and the teaching provided for men in Christ was often emphasized by these pioneers, but has been largely lost in our day.
Preaching the gospel and teaching the converts are as distinct and distinguish~
ble as enlisti!lg an army and training It, ·or as creatmg a school and teaching it. Unhappily for the church and the world, this distinction, if at all conceded as legitimate, is obliterated or annulled in almost all protestant Christendom.
In the discharge of the duties for this the whole oracles of God, and clearly distinguish the difference between preaching and teaching Jesus Christ.
This is no mere speculative distinction.
It was appreciated, fully understood and acted upon ... in the apostolic ministry.
(Popular Lectures and Addresses, pp. 536-37).
There was teaching, there was singing, there was exhortation in the Christian church (in apostolic times); but p'reoching in the church, or to the church is not once named in the Christian Scriptures/
We preach the gospel to unbelievers, to aliens, or those who have not received it" (Millenial Harbinger, 1862).
This may sound a bit eccentric to our modern ears, but it is a distinction which has been recognized by one of the greatest New Testament scholars of our day. C. H.
Dodd of Cambridge, one of the chairmen of the translating committee of the New England Bible wrote:
For the church, to preach was not the same thing as to deliver moral instruction or exhortation. While the church was concerned to hand on the teaching of the law, it was not by this that it made converts. It was by kerygma, Says Paul, not by didache, that it pleased God to save man. Much of our preaching in the church of the present day would not have been recognized by the early Christians as kerygma ( The A poRtolic Preaching).
Dodd's discussion of the nature of the kergyma is regarded by most New Testament scholars as a kind of breakthrough in modern recovery of the ancient distinction, but, of course, we know that Campbell had this truth clearly in mind 100 years earlier. I make a great deal of this point because I think it one of the most significant keys to the success of the Restoration movement's plea for Christian unity.
Campbell properly relegated these matters to areas of difference among Christians, not as distinctions between Christians and non-Christians. Christian unity is ~ product of God based upon man's faith, and submission in baptism-upon his response to the gospel. Without this there is no Christian unity because there can be no Christians.
Our Restoration pioneers insisted upon the gospel and its terms as the only basis for making Christians.
Upon this platform the movement grew phenomenally as it reached men tired of party strife and denominational wars.
There was not perfect unanimity among the pioneers except upon the gospel itself.
Although inferences and deductions from Scripture premises, when fairly inferred, may be truly called the doctrine of God's holy word, yet are they not formally binding upon the consciences of Christians farther than they perceive the connection, and evidently see that they are so.
This reflects one of the mottos soon adopted by the movement, a motto which became the watchword of Christians across the country as the appeal for unity in Christ rang out. "In essentials, unity; in opinions, liberality; in everything, charity."
Conclusion and Summary In 1976 perhaps we can reflect and recapture the spirit of the earlier pleaa scriptural balance between emphases on unity and freedom. We read Ephesians 4
and Romans 14 and see that the program must hold to the scriptural platform for unity while exhibiting that sweet charity which respects brethren when they differ in matters not essential. As we look around us at the shambles that has been made of the Restoration plea, surely we can be open to the appeal for a more scriptural and practical platform for unity than what we and our brethren have often followed.
There is encouraging evidence that such a reevaluation is occurring, that by God's help we may be on the way to taking up where our fathers left off 100 years ago.
In summary, I suggest that the Restoration movement in America of the early nineteenth century brought back to focus for Christendom five important points:
1. The sole authority of the word in matters of faith 2. Freedom of thought where the Scriptures do not clearly speak 3. The evil of sectarianism among Christians 4. The significance of Christianity's two great ordinances-baptism and the Lord's Sunner--one at the gate nnd the other within the kingdom of Christ 5. The nature of the church of Christ, and of her government according to Scripture.
There has been no time in Christian history when these principles were more needed than now; no time when the Restoration plea was more appropriate than now. Were we all to dare to recapture fully that grand plea, we would heal our divisions and get on with the business of taking the world for Christ. Jesus prayed, you know, that his discinles would be one that the world might believe. There is thus no more pressing imperative than that upon which hinges the conversion of the world.
God hasten the day!
3703 48th, Lub~cck, TX 79413
FIRM FOUNDATION-AUGUST 10, 1976
THE RESTORATION PRJNOIPLE ( Con·tin ued from pa;ge 5 )
self solve our problems in the realm of what has been termed "lateral fellowship,"
or fellowship between brethren and between local churches. If we honestly believe that some of our brethren sin in some of the things that they do and teach, how can there ·be the fellowship between us that we all wish could exist?
From the standpoint of differences of individual conscience, the problem can be dealt with more easily, for it does not necessarily involve the group. But in regard to differences of such nature that we cannot worship together or ·work together in the same congregation, we are in trouble. I do not believe that we can solve this problem by simply loving one another or pretending that these important differences do not exist. Some time or other we are going to have to face these issues squarely and be willing to sit down as brethren and study them prayerfully in the light of the Scriptures and try to remove these barriers.
In making a realistic approach to our problems we must also remember that it took a long time for us to "get this way,"
and we are not going to be able to solve all of our problem overnight. I rejoice that efforts toward unity are being made, but all of us would deplore the creation of a "unity sect" among us through too much haste. I know that no one intends or desires this, but I see the distinct possibility of it. Such a thing could defeat the purpose of those who desire unity and could actually impede the progress toward unity by adding another sect to the motley coJJection that we already have. 4. In the next place, our search for unity demands that we keep the lines of communication open between us. Various meetings and other efforts in recent years have done much to improve conditions in this area. Too long have we pull~d ourselves into our various shells and have been unwilling or afraid to talk thinPS over with one another. Thus a communications barrier has been erected that has made it imnossibJe for us to know, understand. and love one another: and any progress toward unitv is impossible in such an Btmosphere. 5. We must pray for 'ltnity while we work for it in every legitimate way. The Lord nrayed for unity, and so should we. His hand is not shortened that it cannot reach out to help us to close our rifts and to heal COMMUNION BREAD We keep on hand regularly a supply of fresh. pure, unleavened bread for communion purposes. Eleven wafers in the small carton and three of these cartons to the large carton--all carefully sealed so it will keep indefinitely. Every congregation should have on hand a good supply at all times. Price: Large carton, each, $3.00, plus 50c postage and handling.
Firm Foundation Publishing House Box 610, Austin, Texas 78767
our wounds. Let us accentuate the many areas of agreement among us, ~bile recognizing the areas of disagreement ·and the need of working toward greater common understanding. Let us love as brethren and live in a way that we shall merit one .. another's confidence.
IV. We should remember that the work of restoration is a continuing process.
May the Lord help us in our efforts to pursue and to implement in our time the great ideal of the complete restoration of the Lord's church and of Christianity as it was in the beginning, as it came from the hand of God.
Houston, TX Wendell Winkler, 6209 Ahbott Ave., Fort Worth, TX 761rl8, June 8: In recent meetings in Muskogee, Okla. (East Olanulgee), Cleburne, Texas (Eastside), Mangum and Miami, Okla., there have been 30 responses, eight of whim were bapti&ms. I begin a meeting Monday evening in Parrish, Ala. We break ground for our new meeting lhouse soon. We will be located on the new 1-20
highway in South Arlington. We have already sold our present facilities. When the building is completed the congregation will be known as the Pleasant Ridge Church of Ghrist.
Don R. House, 1315 W. Bristol Road, FHnt, MI 48507, April 12: The church here just concluded a seven-meeting '~Freedom in Truth" campaign with Mile~ Sinapiades of Benton, Ark., as the speaiker. Six weeks of concontrated visitation brought 40 responses to the Lord's invitation and the series of meetings produced 135 responses. Attendance averaged 755 per service with the top being 1046. The campaign was designed primarily to reach the unfaitthful in our Lord and many long out df duty were rest('lred.
BILL SNOW TO DIRECf SCHOOL OF PRAOTICAL EVANGELISM The elders at Randol Mill, Arlington, Texas, are ihappy to announce that Bill Snow is the new director of the School of PraCtical Evangelism, beginning June 20. Bjll has ibeen serving as minister of personal evangelism with the Randol Mill since September, 1974.
It will be a major. pul'lpOse to train men in the field of evangelism, who in turn can go and train other Christians to teach the lost.
PUll TO IUILD c••ra • •ursl•"·· • ~c••• A Chris~~~~ Inc. ~
CHULES C. llfWH, PIIS.
A Complete Service PLAN-fiNANCE-CONSTIUCTIOI MANAIEIENT CBUROH FINANCE Did You Know Your ,first Year Payments Could Be This low?
$75,000.00- $114.00 per wk.
$100,000.00- $152.00 per wk.
$150,000.00- $228.00 per wfc.
$200,000.00- $304.00 per wk.
$300,000.00- $456.00 per wk.
Based on 8 per cent, 15-year graduated repayment call or write AMERICAN SECURITY CHURCH FINANCE, INC.
Suite 115
4466 Elvis Presley BJvd.
Memphis, Tennessee 38lll6
Phone: (901) 332-4782
332-5864
PLANNING TO BUILD?
Con•tlnental Church Builders is in its 14th year of successful operaltlon.
Let us assist you in pl&~nnin·g toward construction Olf your new building.
Broobure sent on request. CaH collect ...
CONTINENTAL CHURCH BUILDERS, INC. 2814 Granny White Pike (615) 888-2818
P. 0. Box 40289
Nashville, Tennessee 8'1204
ROSE CITY SCHOOL OF PREACHING Full-Time School Begins Sept. 13, 1976
Ni•ght classes wiU also be conducted.
e VA. Approved • Sixth year of operation • Tuition free • Licensed by Ark. Board of Education • Taught by dedicated and qualified faculty, the courses include studies in Old and New Testament, Greek, Bible Geography, Christian Evidences, and The Practical Field For catalog and application, write or call:
Reggie Nails, Director ROSE CITY SCHOOL OF PREACHING P. 0. Box 3262, 5601 Lynch Drive, North Little Rock, Ark. "'7211'7
Phone (501) 945-22'7'7 or 045-38'75
11 [507]
THE PRESENT STATUS OF THE RESTORATION 1\IOVEMENT (Continued from page 6)
inference? Most of us see the command as pattern authority. Approved example and necessary inference are not so clear. Inferences are an exercise in human logic ~nd are wide open to human error. There 1s a place for inferred pattern but we must realize the greater possibility of mistake and should not bind inferences on others.. Examples can only be permissive authorIty and never restrictive authority. To illustrate:
every instance of observing the Lord's Supper in the New Testament shows the disciples meeting in an upper· room.
This, clearly, is permission to meet in an upper room, but certainly does not restrict observance of the Lord's Supper to upper rooms.. Again, immersion is a command. We are ~thout authority to substitute sprinkling m the place of immersion, just as we lack authority to substitute the reading of the Lord's Prayer as an initiatory rite in the place of baptism. Examples in the New Testament give us permission of baptizing the converts "the same hour of the night:" ~ut, if we wait until the next day, we sbll obey the command. These illustrations show that the command, but not the example, provides the authoritative pattern.
Relativism: Other good minds in the restoration movement see the solution to our problem in a form of relativism. They have concluded that some commands are important, while others are of relatively less significance. Baptism, they argue, is necessary; but whether or not to have Sunday schools, instrumental music, plur8:
lity of cups, mutual edification, etc., are mmor and should not become dividing issues.
No part of God's truth. however, is relatively less important than other parts.
By what authority may we make one command relatively less important than another?
God's truth on the issues which have divided us is important and, we may add, vital to our confession of Jesus as Lord. We may be wrong about our understanding of God's commands; but truth i~ obie~tivP anrl is neither relative nor unimportant.
Of the three solutions consirlered to this point, this p~tner rejects isolationism as wrong. Relativism is considered an improper solution. But none of this is to say that the restoration plea should bP. abandoned.
A believer in an inspired Bible is obli~ed to plead for restoration of the Bible's commanded pattern. We will propose St solution for a sorely troubled restoration movement.
Fellowshiv in A utonomu: Let us recognize thllt all churches, like human heings, are fullv autonomous under God. Each person.
and each church, is free to assume full resnonsibility both for all its decisions and for the consE!(fuences of those decisions.
Each nerson and conRTegation stands or falls alone before God the only judJre.
In the conte~t of congrel!"ational ~tutonomy let us remember that thPre never has been a true church. Even first: century churches were composed of sinful people 12 [508]
with sinful practices-all the day from women teachers, to immorality in the church, to denial of the resurrection. There was no such thing as a perfect church in New Testament times, nor is there one now. Sinful human beings cannot restore a perfect New Testament church, even though they must always try to do that because of their love for the Lord. This is to point up the need for us to forbear the sinful errors of others just as we wish forbearance for our own transgressions.
Only fo-r forbear~nce can F~inful peonle ever exist together in any relationship. We share, or have fellowship, where there is agreement. But we must withhold fellowship everywhere we feel there is sin. This is fellowship in autonomy. It asks no one to violate his conscience. It asks no one to endorse all the activities of the other. It removes us from the judgement seat and leave~ judgment to God. Lovingly, and with self-consideration, we exhort one another where we feel there is sin lest any of us be overcome by the deceitfulness of sin.
"But," one may rightly ask, "where is the basic beginning point? Throughout the New Testament, you will find that confession of Jesus Christ as God's Son and Lord is the foundation of the church. It is the criterion by which we know that another has the Spirit of Christ. By this confession we know the true prophet from the fa]se. Here is the beginning point. We may share with all confessed servants of Jesus wherein we agree. Where sin has entered neither God nor we are in communion with them, but we must exhort each other toward truth. The final judgment is God's; ours is to exhort and forbear.
Let us, laying aside party spirit, seize the great opportunities that are ours today, aim at a complete restoration of the New Testament church, and press on to our goal in Christ-to the praise of his glory.
ACU BREAKS SUMMER ENROLLMENT RECORD Abilene Ohristian University has estalblished an all-time enrollment record for the first half of its 1976 summer session with 1,294
students, according to final figures released •by Paul Wilson, AOU assistant registrar.
'fhe •1976 total erases a long-standing record of 1,265 students set during ·the 1965
summer session, and is also the third straight enrollment increase for the summer session.
Dr. Edwin H. Enzor, AOU assistant dean and professor of communication, is director of the session.
The first half summer session concluded with final examination on Wednesday, July 7.
Registration for the seeond half was lheld Thursday, July 8, and classes began July ·9.
Jerry H. Wilson, ·Box 384, Waldorf, MiD 20601, May 21: GaRb Blook of Silver Spring, Md., preached a fine series of lessons for us April 25-29 entitled "God's Plan for Redeeming Man," based on Romans 1-8. We had one -baptism May 2.
Announcing the publication of a definitive, scholarly study of the origins of the charismatic movement.
~ ~®~ £ml1·LP®~m Tile Beallaglllll Cllarlsmallc Revivals Ia Modera America DAVID EDWIN DRRnt., Jr.
Dmwing on personal interviews ood thousands of publications, this carefully researched, objective study examines the origins and traces the evolution of the penteco9tal reviwl. Harrell tells the story of the movement from the healing revivals of William Branham, Jack Coe, A. A. Allen, and Oral Rdberts in the late 1940's and 1950's to the new charismablc movement of the late 1960's and 1970's. $10.95
--------CUp and Mail Today!--------
Firm Foundation Publishing House Box 610, Austin, Texus 78767
·I enclose $------·--- Please send ----- copies of ALL Things Are Possible at $10.95 plus 5% postage and handlmg. (T~ residents radd 5%
sales tax.)
~a.me Address C~tY------------------------ S~e------------------ Zip _______ _
FIRM FOUNDATION-AUGUST 10. 1976
"MAN, GOD IS ALL OVER YO' FACE!"
Many years ago I went to a station to board a bus to go to a gospel meeting. Upon entering the station I overheard a conversation between bwo black men who had noticed my presence. One of them remarked to the other, "See that man-he is a preacher."
The other one expressed doub t. After J: had boarded the bus the one who had identified me as a preacher came aboard. As he passed down the aisle he paused at my seat, broke out in a big sunshine smile, and, in a tone which could be 11Card by all on the bus, said, "Yo' is a preacher, ain't you?" When I told him I was, he laughed out loud and said, "I told that man in the bus station th a,t you wuz a preacher, and he denied it." Then I asked him flow he had identifled me as a preacher, and he said, "How did I know that you is a p reacher? That is easy, cause yo' has God all over yo' face!" With that remark he took a sent-and, upon raising a window of the bus, ~houted to the man on the outside:, "Yeah he is---J told you he ~vuz a preacher.
I l1ad heard of people 1being referred to as "Christl ike" and "godly," but I had never heard it e~-pressed as tl1is black man had put it. Anyway, I hope t'hat " th is little light of mine" has 1been shining through, whcU1er on my face or in my conduct, since I b ecame a Christian back in 1911. I have spent 64
years of my life-tl10 best part of it- in "holding forth tl1e word of life" as a gospel preadher. At hhe ripe age of 82 I'm looking toward tho sunset- and beyond that the crown which I hope to be ~vorthy to receive.
~olm W. Hedge, 304 Glover Dr., Longvi~
v. TX 75601.
Cecil E. Hill, Box 1498, Riviera, AZ 86442, April 16: Our work with this congregation <is most pleasant and encouraging. The a ttendance has about doubled in the past year.
We are on the beauti ful Colorado River and tl1e summer heat is intense, read1ing as high as 120 degrees. Many people who l ive here plan to be away for most of the summer and that shows up in tl10 attendance. Hmvever, many people from California come here to enjoy the activities on tl1e rh·er. Just across the river in Nevada, the gambling casinos always draw big crowds. This is a great area for flshing, boat races and otl1er water sports.
We believe the church here will continue to do well. We have a nice new building.
NEED SPACE?
SEAT 750
Exciting Fan Design Complete: Sound, Carpet, Furnishings - $160,000.00 -
Paul & Associates 324 E. Locust St.
Tyler, Texas (214) 597-8540
DEBATE ON EVOLUTION SET John Banks, minister, and professor of Anthropology and History at Pepperdine University, will meet Lee Armstrong, professor of Anatomy and PJ1ysio lO!,'Y at Diablo Valley College, in debate at Concord Pavilion in Concord, Calif., on Oct. 5-7 on the q uestion of evolution.
Banks will affirm that scientiRc evidence of all that is, is better explained as to origins and developments by special creation than by evolution. Armstrong will affirm tl1e reverse of this p roposition.
The Pleasant Hill church, 148 Gregory Lane in Pleasant Hill, Calif., is directing arrangements for the debate wJ1ich is e:\pected to draw a large crmvd of interested listeners.
We proudly announce the possible publication of the greatest single set of books in the Restoration Movement, Alexander Campbeii1S monumental work:
THE MILLENNIAL HARBINGER All forty-one volumes-from 1830 to 1870 • Over 600 pages in each volume • Pages enlarged for easy reading • Index in each volume • Natural-colored, quality paper for eye-ease in reading • Beautiful two-color, quality hard-cover binding stamped in gold.
All 41 volumes ready at one time- shipped to you in three cartons. For those who know anything of these unexcelled books, nothing more need be said. A once-in-a-lifetime opportunity.
Don't miss it.
Sale price $350.00 per set. Special pre-publication sale $250.00-Save $100.00 Over 26,000 pages.
WE CANNOT -AND WILL NOT PUBLISH WITHOUT ASSURANCE OF 100 ORDERS-We must know before August 20th.
Send no money-mail the order form below. If we have assurance of the £ale· of 100 sets b-y August 20, we will be able to ship to you by December 5. Let us hear today.
- --------- Clip and mail today - - --- -----
P inn Foundation Publishing House flox G10, 1\ustin, Texas 78767
YES·-reserve Cor me a 41-volu me sel or lhe :\(illcnnial Hal'bingCJ· at the s-pecial pre- publi~tlio n price of $250.00, plus trang;portation costs and sales tax.
N~me ---- - - ------ ------ -------------- ----------------------------------
.\ddress---------------------- City------- ----- ---- S!Jalte ________ Zip _____ 13 [5071
THE FUTURE OF THE RESTORATION MOVmiENT (Continued from page 8)
you react to this headline of the future:
May 1983-"Brain Transplant Successful!
Scientist Lives on in Borrowed Body."
Way out? Men do think so. Christianity Today, February 27, 1976, reports, Incredible as it may seem, most of the technical difficulties have already been solved. Evidence from organ research and animal experimentation increasingly indicates that brain transplantation can be performed now .... Only moral inhibition prevents one neurosurgeon from trying it today.
And while you are thinking about facing that problem, how does the matter of "test-tube babies" strike you?
And with these complex questions consider the rise in sinful practices in our society. Every newspaper reporting a rise in crime and communication media bringing all kinds of sin into our homes. Sin is on the increase. One time we may have spent most of our time fighting the denominations, but it seems that our time will be spent in the future fighting those sins that are "the works of the flesh" which keep me out of God's kingdom.
In our effort to carry on the work of "returning to the Bible for our faith and practice" we will be fac_ed with the fear of becoming a denomination among denominations.
One brother wrote, When I think of the future of our. Restoration Movement, one thing looms large to me: every other restoration movement before our own has eventually lost its fire and has solidified into another peculiar brand of Christianity ... I cannot tell ..... if this end is in store for us. From many signs that I see around nie, however, I fear that we are well down the road to being just another denomination with its peculiar heritage and funny ways of doing things.
"Funny ways of doing things." Tradition can become so strong that we make them the rule of life. Jesus warned us of this when he said, " ... in vain do they worship me, teaching for doctrines the commandments of men" (Mark 7 :7). This problem was present in Jesus' day, it is present today and will be tomorrow. Some one has said if we remove our peculiar traditions concerning our worship services-
our buildings, the arrangements of our buildings for worship services, the type of music that we use in singing our songs, the arrangements of worship, the hour of worship on Lord's days and Wednesday evenings, we would not have too much left to argue about. We have been split asunder over what we call "issues."
There needs to be a reexamination of these "issues" and make sure that we are not concerning ourselves with traditions that we have developed in trying to carry out the p1inciples of the teaching of Christ.
Just maybe we have learned our lesson and will not not aiiow these things to become problems tomorrow. Let our plea be for a"· ... thus saith the Lord."
But the church of tomorrow wiii have opportunity to serve the Lord. This has always been true~ The apostle Paul found 14 ts1o1
an open door in wicked Corinth. Doors are opened to us. Someone has said, "We are missing one of the great potentials of the church in overlooking the house to house teaching. The 'one on one' carrying of the word." He went on to say that we have confined our message within our buildings.
It is in our buildings, he observed, where invitations songs are sung. This is where the sinner responds. Preaching in our buildings should be combined with a houseto-
house message. Interest that is being shown by some of the young people of today indicates that the church of tomorrow will start preaching Jesus Christ in other places than the buildings that we erect.
The church of tomorrow will grow if we put our preachers to preaching the word.
One brother wrote, May God hasten the day when we can liberate our preachers from the printing presses, and needless errands of countless congregations, and let them start again preaching the gospel of God. When this is accomplished the future of the church will be greatly enhanced.
R. Michael Goff, G-6472 Lennon Road, Flint, M[ 48507, June 2: The Lennon Road congregation bad an attendance campaign on May .23 with 1,57~ in Btble sChool and 1,618
in morning worship; 810 came in on 10
busses. We have been :in 1lhe bus ministry 13 months, which has been a tremendous blessing to our evangelistic outreach. So far this year 45 have beep !baptized, most of whom are direct results of bus evangelism.
Working with me are Oharles Gamer, deaf minister; Keith Cagle, bus minister; '3lld Rick Moore, B~ble sohool and youth minil'ter.
Paul D. Murphy, Box 97, Wilmer, AL 36587, May 22: May 16--20 I preached in a meeting for the Safford Road church in Phenix City, Ala. Four responded to the invitation.
For five years Raymond Rucker has done a tremendous work dn this good church.
E. C. McKenzie, 710 Big Rock St., Canton, TX 75103, June 14: Our work at Cross Roads continues to do well. During the past week one was ·baptized and another placed memlbership w:ith us. The future seems very promising.
CHURCH BUSES Used. .. Guaranteed ... De ·pendable. .. Consistent savings in the hundreds of dollars ... "You can't buy better buses a;t better prices anywhere."
TOl\ffiALL BUS COMPANY Tomball, Texas (713) 356-8722
(16 page Gospel Magazine)
MASS COVERAGE BY DIRECT MAll OR BY HAND DELIVERY With Local Church Address on 3 Pages Write for free samples and cost estimates for area coverage STAR BIBLE & TRACT CORP.
Box 13125, Dept. FF Ft. Worth, Texas 76118
New Teaching Tool Now Ready Just off the press is a new type Bible Story Book. It weaves the outstand·
ing sto1ies of the Old Testament and the New into a story that teaches _the scheme of redemption. The author relies heavily on Bible facts, weaving just as much of fiction and imagination as is necessary to help the reader understand how it could have been, and in some instances how it must have been. In the back of the book are 80 p&ges of "Questions for Bible Study" designed to assist the more thorough student in his perusal of the Scriptures. Ideal for a parent to give to a child, or for you to hand to a neighbor. Self-teaching is the best teaching.
A Little Lower Than the Angels Paper: $2.95 by Elizabeth Buchanan --------CUpand Madl Today!-------Firm Foundation Publishing House P. 0. Box 610, Austin, Texas 78767
I enclose $....................... Please send ............ copies of A Little Lowe'r Than the Angels at $2.95 per copy plus 25c postage and handling. (Texas l'esidents add 5% sales tax.)
Name City------------------------- State------------------ Zip _____ Address ------------------------------------------------------
FIRM FOUNDATION-AUGUST 10, 1976
c L A S s I F I E D Advertising In thiN section $1.00 per line. Designed especially to accommodate congregations advertlalng meeting places, preachers seeking work or connegatfons seeking preachers. Also other acceptable mntter.
FORT HOOD - KILLEEN, TEXAS Southside Church of Christ 1505 S. Trlmmler Rd. Paul Wilkinson, Minister. Phone 634-6012. Sun. 9:30 & 10:30 A.M. & 6:00
P. .M., Wed. 7:00 P.M.:::_ ____ _
PORTLAND, OREGON. Come to a new, loving missionary area. Wrlte C. Guild, 13620
S. W. Pac. Hwy., Tigard, OR 97223.
YU!IA, ARIZ.,. 651 W. ::Sth St. Sunday-
10, 11 a.m. & 6:30 p.m. Ph. 344-3750
--- DENVER. COLORADO So.228
LAKEWOOD CHURCH OF CHRIST 455 So. Youngfield Ct.
Tele.: 988-1024
See Yellow Pages For Service Times Translation For Deaf. W. E. Young, Evan.
TURKEY CALLING 1 Help us keep your loved ones busy for Him. Send name and organization to Church of Christ, Tuslog Det. 94, APO NY. 09324.
HELP PREVENT CHlu:..:;S..:.T_IAN_ D_ R_O_P_O_U_T_S_l If anyone has Christla:~ friends who are moving, these triends may receive the name and address of the church in their new locality, In any of the fitty states.
In addition, they will be contacted by a nearby congregation. Just send th& Christian's name and new address to Elders, Church of Christ. P. 0. Box 2277, Vancouver, Washington 98661. 1\lonterrey, 1\lexlco; Ave. Funcllclones 109
OTE. Frace. Buenos Aires David Cardenas, Evans;ellst PRESTON ROAD CHURCH OF=C=-HRI--S-TSCHOOL OF PREACHING 0409 Preston Road, Dallas, Texas '15205
Eldred Stevens, Director New Class Admitted August 9, 1976
IDA.BO -SPRINGS, COLO. Pine Slope RoncL R. Paul Smith. preacher. Phone, 567-4511.
COMING TO-PHILADELPHIA in 1976?
Visiting Liberty Bell, Independence Hall.
Valley Forge? (All within 30 minutes)
Contact Church-300 Whit& Horse Pike, Collingswood, N. J. Phone 609-854-0197.
LOS ANGELES, CALIFORNIA.
CENTRAL CHURCH OF CHBJST 12th and Soover Stl'eeta Sunday worship: 10:50 A.M. & 6:00 P.M.
Paul E. Harper, Minister 4'13-8228
PHOENIX, ARIZ., Southwest congregation, 3849 W. Encanto Blvd., 9:45. 10:40 a.m., 6 p.m. Ted Cline (Min.) 931-7751, 272-2551.
GOING TO ALASKA? Contact one of two congregations ln Fairbanks area: 645 11th Ave., where Howard Swinney preaches (phone 456-4921) or 22 Mile Richardson Highway (Eielson AFB) where Charles Davis preaches ( 488-&664).
MANHATTAN CHURCH wlll contact your loved ones In New York City and the Northeast. 48 E. 80th St., New York, N. Y. 10()21, (212) 737-4900 or 432-1088. Sun. 10, 11, 5:30; Wed. 6:30.
MILITARY! MOVING TO SAN ANTONIO!
We need workers for a growing congregation serving Laclcland & Kelly AFB. Lackland Terrace Church of Christ. 1802 SW Loop 410, 512/6674..,6417. Mlac Bartee, Minister.
ALASKA - ANCHORAGE CHURCH OF CHRIST, 204 w. lOth Ave. wm contact relatives or friends In Alaska. James Grotts, Pat McMahan, or Bill McFarland, Box 314, Anchorage, Alaska 99510. Phone 272-7584 or 344-5719.
DAY AREA SCHOOL OF PREACHING, 2808
35th Ave., Oakland, Calif. 94619. California's only full time school offering five major fields of study plus graduate study.
This is our tenth year of operation. Write for full particulars. James W. Ferguson, Sr .• Di·rector; John Carroll Brown. Dean.
BEAR VALLEY CHURCH OF CHRIST School of Preaching 270'1 South Lamar, Denver, Colo. 8022'1
Roy H. Lanier, Sr .. Dean Leonard M. Gray, Director P=-u-e,..bl,..o-,_,Colorado 81001 Church of Christ In Belmont, 1022 Liberty Ln.. John Bromley, Evangelist, Ph. 542-0084. Sun. 9:00 & 10:00
A.M. and 6 P.M.; Wed. 7:30 P.M.
EV ANSVILLE. IND.. 2205 E. Jforg"~~n Ave ..
us. 4CIO East Opposite K-Mart. Office 4'1'1-
52'11. Dobby Wade, Min, 4'10-40tSO.
FAIRBORN, OHIO near DAYTON and Wright-Patt-AFB. 922 S. Central; 878-0452.
ARLINGTON, VA.., 20 N. Irvin&: St., corner of Irving & Arllngton Blvd. (Rt. 50). Convenient to nation's capital & hi3toric N. Va.
Lord's Day Worship 10:30 A.M., 4:00 P.M.;
Bible Study 9:30 A.M. Sun., 7:30 P.M. Wed.
For transportatlon-dlrectlons ph. 628-0535
or 941-1585. Worship with us-Enjoy a Spiritual Feast.
SAN BERNARDINO, OALIFORNIA., Uptown Church of Christ, 3030 North E. St., C. E.
Parker, minister. Ph. 882-2262. Sun. 9 :30
& 10:30 a.m. and 6 p.m.: Wed. 7:00 p.m.
Wan:ted: an wggresslve minister for a newly established congregation in Dillon, Montana.
A college town, population 6,000, surrounding area 10,00(). We have a newly completed 4400-square foot building. In addition to our contribution, support for the work here is being provided by several other congregations. Reply Church of Christ, P. 0. Box 46, Dillon, Montana 59725
or call 406-683-5315.
TOUR HOSTS WANTED. Wholesale Tours International, Jack P. Lewis, Area Advisor, 1132 South Perkins, Memphis, Tenn. 3811'1.
Ph. (901) 683-1678.
LET M ~<..: PRINT YOUR CHURCH DIRECTORIES.
SERVICE FAST. COMPLETED OnDERi3 RETURNED WITHI~ ONE WEEK. PRICE VERY REASONABLE. 75c EACH COPY. SEND FOR FREE SAMPLE DIRRCTOHY. SPANGLER PRINTING SERVICE, POST OFFICE BOX 1710, AUBURN, :~A 95603.
MOUNTAIN CABIN SITES Along the North Fork of the Poudre River in Northern Colorado. For sale to raise endowment for Bible Camp on adjolnin~
Cherokee Christian Ranch. Write for full information:
Board of Directors Cherokee Christian Ranch 2810 Meadow-Lark Avenue Ft. Collins, CO 80521
Phone 482-7788
Southside Church-Rochester, NY, has need for a mature gospel preacher and effective personal worker. Write P. 0. Box 9849, Rochester. NY 14623.
UCLA-WEST LOS ANGELES Know anyone attending UCLA or living· In West LA.? If yes, let us know so that we might contact them. Culver-Palms Church of Christ, 9733 Ven·ice Blvd., L. A., Cal. 90034, (213) 838-7181. Frank Pack, preacher.
FOR SALE New and USPd church buses School Bus Exchange Phone 226-1918
Dallas, Texas Frankfurt, Germany-Senckenbergnnlage tD. English Services: Sun. 10:15, 11:15 a.m.
& 6:00 p.m.; Wed. 7:30 p.m. George Winegeart.
evan. Phone: 06145-33433 or 0611-
779525. Send us names and addresses of people in Germany.
OKINAWA, JAPAN:::-.--:H==-e,..lp--u-s_w_a..,.tc-:h,----::f-or souls of Christians on Okinawa. Send name/
organization to: Elders. Church of Chriat, PO Box 298, Okinawa City, Japan 904.
PREACHER WANTED In Gymple, Queensland, Australia. Small congregation 100 miles north of Brisbane, in 1200 population area. cattle & fruit growing. Home with partial support provided.
Church of Christ. P. 0. Box 170, Gympie, Queensland, Australia 4570.
Church located in large rural area, 1·2 miles north of Charleston, WV, new building, minister needed with small family, zeal for personal ,,~ork, growing congregation. Interested please write Sissonville Church of Christ, P. 0. Box 111, Sissonville. WV 25320
or phone Area Code 304/984-3269.
I am interested in becoming your education director. For complete resume, write P. 0.
Box 864, Snyder, T=.:X::,_:7:..:9:..:5:..:4.:.:9•:.,..--___...-=-----
- PREACHER wANTED Full time prE!l!lcher needed for small congragation in northern Michrigan. Three bedroom house available, salary negotiable.
If you are from Ohio, •Indiana or Michigan area, please contact Ed Andrews. 3370 Jeffs Road, Merritt, Mich. 49667 for further Information.
West Helena, Arknnsns BUS '65 Chev., 54 paS'senger, 6 cylinder. G'ood cond. $1500.00. Joe Elrod, 501/57.2-6538;
Bailey Watson, 501/338-6822.
Immediate opening for full time preacher.
A self-supporting congregation. Contact Lloyd Smith, Church of Christ, Box 52, Summerville, Pa. 15864 or caU 814/856-2710.
ForSalc: One 1966 G.MC. 73-passenger bus, a five-speed transmission, V-6 engine. Phone after 6 p.m. 817 /38'6-5857.. }IILITARY }lOVING TO GEORGIA'f If you are moving to Fort Stewart, Georgia, or know anyone who is, please contact the elders, Wayne Stewart or AI Thompson, or the minister Ronnie Ulrey at Hlnesvllle Church of Christ, 317 West Court Street.
Hinesville, Ga. 31313, phone 912/876-2816
(collect).
'\Yant to sell your back issues of Firm Foundation? Contact: Tom Heese, 2125 So.
Irving, Denver, Colo. 80219. -
NEEDED: Faithful Christian man to work on a farm. House is furnished. $500 a month. Send references to Ted Goode, Rt. 2, Holly, Colo .. 303/727-8381.
INVESTIGATEr The Firm Foundation tries to screen advertfsln.:-. and will not kllowfngly take questionable advertising.
But It Ia the render's responalbiUty to lnvestlgute.
Like nny other paper, we sometimes unwittingly run nn unworthy ad.
As the old saying goes, before TOU Invest, lnvestls;nter CAMPAIGN COLOMBIA SET FOR AUGUST August 9 is the date set for a campaign ibeing planned for the cities of Medellin and Bogota, Colombia. At tlhe present time workers are committed from Lubbock, Texas, and Murfreesboro, 'Tenn., to join with the workers already here. Actual !Work on the campaign began last April during a special series of preparatory studies. \From then until now, over 80 baptisms have. resulted, as the Colombians are taking their faith to others.
Speakers include Carl James, head of the Spanish Department of the Sunset s·dhool of Preaching; Eloy Garcia, also from Lu!bbdck;
T. Coy Porter, evangelist !from Murfreesoro;
and Harland Rail, missionazy in Medellin.
You can still become part of the effort.
Contact: Carl James, Box 16490, Lubbock, TX 79491.
W. J. Stanley, Box 286, De Soto, MO 63020, June 1:7: The church here has just concluded a campaign and meeting with Jim M. Young and ten wor-kers from White's Ferry Road Sdhool of Biblical Studies of West Monroe, La. We moved here last September. Since then 21 have been restored and 16 baptized.
SCHOOL BUSES For Your Bus Program 20 To Choose From Southside Church of Christ 108 W. Gibson-Ph. 444-4386
Austin, Texas 15 [5111
********* 1c ********** ** ** ** ** ** **
...... ...... iC. ...~... ...... ...... •....
~
HOLY BIBLE CONTAINING THE OLD AND NEW TESTAMENTS TIMELY BUT NOT DATED FREEDOM EDITION The Best Bible for the Price Anywhere!
$ •
plus 1 Oc each for postage anywhere in the USA, in lots of 100
King James Version Entire Bible Quantity Prices Each 1.95
Per 100, ea Per 500, ea Per 1000, ea 1.75
1.50
1.35
...... .... iC Gold Stamped Type Specimen:
~ Durable Paperback refuseth to come with us.
~ 15 'lr And Ba'-IAk sent yet again princes, ~ more, and more honourable than they.
iC 16 And they came to Bli'-laam, and said to ~ Size: 5 X 7 X 1 him, Thus saith Ba'-lak the son of Zip'-por, !~ for Fine White Bible Paper *~
.. * ~ PEWS*CLASSROOM*BUS MINISTRY*MISSIONARIES * NEW CONVERTS *
~ * t PRISON & JAIL MINISTRIES *PERSONAL USE *SOUL WINNING*GIFTS i .... ** ------------------------------------------------------- : Mail To:
: Firm Foundation Publishing House I I P. 0. Box 610 Austin, Texas 78767
I 0 Please send copies of Freedom Edition KJV HOLY BIBLE at $1.75 per copy plus 1 Oc each postage (Min. order, 100 copies). 0 I prefer the Bible text edition (Cat. No. 15 JOT). 0 I prefer the Bible with 'Salvation' markings edited by Alvin Jennings (Cat. No. 151 OS). 0 Please send copies (less than 100 copies) at $1.95 plus -
10 c postage. 0 I also want copies of companion' 'freedom edition' songbook of 200 old-time favorites edited by Tillet S. Teddlie at 95c each plus 5c each postage $ __ enclosed Na~-----------------------------------------Addr~-----------------------------------------
City _____ State _______ zip ________ _
Bv-------------------------------------
I I I I I I I I I I L-------- I HOW LONG HAS IT BEEN SINCE YOU BOUGHT A BIBLE FOR $1.75? --------J 16 [512] FIRM FOUNDATION- AUGUST 10, 1976